Hawaii statutes.
[§845-2] Career criminal prosecution
program. (a) There shall be established a career criminal prosecution
program, whose purpose shall be the investigation and prosecution of those
persons identified as habitual or career criminals.

(b) The office of the attorney general shall
administer the program, and develop a plan of financial and technical
assistance for prosecuting attorneys' offices. The attorney general shall
direct the program and may allocate and award funds to counties in which career
criminal prosecution units are established in substantial compliance with the
policies and criteria established by the attorney general. The establishment
of these policies and criteria shall not be subject to chapter 91, but the
criteria shall be based on the general definition in section 845-3. [L 1979, c
104, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next